North Dakota, session 69, HB1347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 27-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
District court supervised treatment programs - Roles and responsibilities.
Under a district court supervised treatment program:
1. The department of corrections and rehabilitation shall supervise offenders sentenced to
supervised probation according to the policies and procedures of the department of
corrections and rehabilitation.
2. The department of health and human services shall oversee treatment services according to
the policies, procedures, and best practices of the department of health and human services.
3. The district court shall provide judicial direction, guidance, and coordination within all
approved treatment and compliance related specialized dockets.

H. B. NO. 1347 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1347.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State